Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.300

Rules and regulations—Filing—Publication.

Every rule, regulation, or order promulgated by the commission shall be filed with the director, and shall be published in a legal newspaper of general circulation in each of the three districts. All such rules, regulations, or orders shall become effective pursuant to the provisions of RCW 34.05.380.

[ 1985 c 469 s 7; 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 38; 1961 c 11 s 15.28.300. Prior: 1947 c 73 s 31; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-40.]